src/Segmental/Segmental.foma
source ../CharacterClasses/CharacterClasses.foma
define Truncation V -> 0 || V C+ / "+" (V "-" n) _ "-" V;
define SingleCoronalResonant P (B) [r|l|n] - [r (B) r|l (B) l|n (B) n];
define RelatorOrModal [{nē}|{ne}|{n(e)}] "-" | [{na}|{n(a)}|l|{le}] ["-"|.#.];
define Derivational "+" [{ġe}|{ni}|{ži}];
define Elision [a|e|i] -> 0 || SingleCoronalResonant (B) _ "-" RelatorOrModal | Derivational;
define lnAssimilation [l|n] -> r || r (Boundary)  "-" _ ,,
                       n -> l || l (Boundary) "-" _ ;
define Anaptyxis [..] -> ɑ || C _ (B) n "-" n | l "-" l | r "-" r;
define VowelHarmony	ɑ -> a || A [C|"-"]* _ ,, ɑ -> e || E [C|"-"]* _ ,,
					ɑ -> i || I [C|"-"]* _ ,, ɑ -> O || O [C|"-"]* _ ,,
					ɑ -> u || U [C|"-"]* _ ;
define EmbracketedElision "(" ["+"|Phoneme]+ (">") ")" -> 0 || _ ;
define Devoicing b -> p, d -> t, g -> k, v -> f, ž -> š, ġ -> ḫ || _ ;
define ProgrNasalAssimilation n -> š // š ("=") _ ;
define Triple "-" š -> 0 || _ "=" š^2; 
define RegrNasalAssimilation n -> š || _ "+" š;
define LabialAssimilation f -> p || p "-" _ ,, f -> t || t "-" _ ;
define Morphonology Truncation .o. Elision .o. lnAssimilation .o.
    Anaptyxis .o. VowelHarmony .o.
    EmbracketedElision .o. Devoicing .o. ProgrNasalAssimilation .o. Triple .o.
	RegrNasalAssimilation .o. LabialAssimilation;
define Voicing p -> b, t -> d, k -> g, f -> v, š -> ž, ḫ -> ġ || V (Boundary) _ (Boundary) V ,
														_ (Boundary) R , R (Boundary)_ , _ .#.;
define Phonology Voicing;
define Segmental Morphonology .o. Phonology;
